Arkansas, session 2025, HB1117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-163. Instruction on firearm safety — Required.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Protect Arkansas children from the accidental discharge of
firearms by providing age-appropriate firearm education and instruction; and
(2) Empower the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission to work
with the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education to create and approve
age-appropriate firearm safety courses.
(b)(1) The division, in consultation with the commission, shall
*TNL036*
02-17-2025 09:09:53 TNL036

As Engrossed: H1/28/25 H2/17/25 HB1117
determine the earliest grade in which it is appropriate for students enrolled
in public school districts and open-enrollment public charter schools to
begin receiving instruction on firearm safety.
(2) In order to make the determination required under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the division and the commission shall
study relevant data and risk factors, including without limitation the
earliest age at which:
(A) Incidents of injury involving firearms are reported;
and
(B) Children are susceptible to harm from unsecured
firearms that they are able to gain access to.
(c) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public school
district and open-enrollment public charter school shall annually provide
students with age-appropriate and grade-appropriate instruction on firearm
safety.
(d) The curriculum or program of instruction used to educate students
on firearm safety under subsection (b) of this section shall:
(1) Be approved by the division;
(2) Begin in the earliest appropriate grade as determined by the
division and the commission under subsection (a) of this section and continue
in each subsequent grade through grade twelve (12);
(3) Include instruction on the following without limitation:
(A) The steps to take if a student finds an unsecured
firearm, including without limitation the importance of:
(i) Avoiding injury if the student finds an
unsecured firearm;
(ii) Never touching a firearm if the student finds
an unsecured firearm; and
(iii) Immediately notifying an adult of the location
of the unsecured firearm;
(B) School safety relating to firearms; and
(C) The proper handling and safe storage of firearms; and

(4) Include neutral viewpoints on all included topics, including
without limitation the prevention of accidental firearm injury.

02-17-2025 09:09:53 TNL036

As Engrossed: H1/28/25 H2/17/25 HB1117
(e)(1) The division shall not approve a curriculum or program of instruction
used to educate students on firearm safety if the curriculum, program of
instruction, or any of the instructional materials used as part of the
curriculum or program of instruction bear a brand or stated organizational
affiliation.
(2) However, curricula, programs of instruction, or any of the
instructional materials used as part of the curricula or programs of
instruction used to educate students on firearm safety may bear a brand
issued by the State of Arkansas or any of its departments, agencies, or
divisions.
(f) The division shall use the following preferred methods of
instruction in determining the curriculum or program of instruction used to
educate students on firearm safety:
(1) The viewing of a video produced by the commission or a
commission-approved source;
(2) The review of online resources and materials; and
(3)(A) An alternative curriculum, which may include an off-
campus, commission-approved firearm safety course.
(B)(i) An off-campus, commission-approved firearm safety
course may be provided in conjunction with a live-fire exercise or sporting
event.
(ii) If an off-campus, commission-approved firearm
safety course is provided in conjunction with a live-fire exercise or
sporting event, the provider of the off-campus, commission-approved firearm
safety course and the public school district or open-enrollment public
charter school in which the participating student is enrolled shall obtain
prior written approval from the participating student's parent, legal
guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the participating student.
(g) As used in this section, "firearm" means the same as defined in §
5-1-102.

/s/R. Scott Richardson



02-17-2025 09:09:53 TNL036